Utah statutes.
48-1-6.   Partner agent of partnership as to partnership business.
(1) Every partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its
business, and the act of every partner, including the execution in the
partnership name of any instrument for apparently carrying on in the usual way
the business of the partnership of which he is a member, binds the
partnership, unless the partner so acting has in fact no authority to act for
the partnership in the particular matter and the person with whom he is
dealing has knowledge of the fact that he has no such authority.
(2)  An act of a partner which is not apparently for the carrying on of the
business of the partnership in the usual way does not bind the partnership,
unless authorized by the other partners.
(3)  Unless authorized by the other partners or unless they have abandoned the
business, one or more but less than all of the partners have no authority to:
(a)  Assign the partnership property in trust for creditors or on the
assignee's promise to pay the debts of the partnership.
(b)  Dispose of the good will of the business.
(c)  Do any other act which would make it impossible to carry on the ordinary
business of the partnership.
(d)  Confess a judgment.
(e)  Submit a partnership claim or liability to arbitration or reference.
(4)  No act of a partner in contravention of a restriction on authority shall
bind the partnership to persons having knowledge of the restriction.
